Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 11. Merger and Share Exchange.

§79-4-11.01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Merger” means a business combination pursuant to Section 79-4-11.02.

“Organizational documents” means the basic document or documents that create, or determine the internal governance of, an eligible entity.

“Party to a merger” or “party to a share exchange” means any domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that will:

Merge under a plan of merger;

Acquire shares or eligible interests of another corporation or eligible entity in a share exchange; or

Have all of its shares or eligible interests or all of one or more classes or series of its shares or eligible interests acquired in a share exchange.

“Share exchange” means a business combination pursuant to Section 79-4-11.03.

“Survivor” in a merger means the corporation or eligible entity into which one or more other corporations or eligible entities are merged. A survivor of a merger may preexist the merger or be created by the merger.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 15; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 26, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 16, renumbered and amended former § 79-4-11.01 as present § 79-4-11.02.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted former definitions (a) and (d), “Interests” and “Other entity,” and redesignated the remaining paragraphs accordingly; substituted “eligible” for “other” preceding “entity” throughout the section; and made a minor stylistic change.

§79-4-11.02.
Merger.

One or more domestic corporations may merge with a domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity pursuant to a plan of merger.

A foreign corporation, or a domestic or foreign eligible entity, may be a party to the merger, or may be created by the terms of the plan of merger, only if:

The merger is permitted by the laws under which the corporation or eligible entity is organized or by which it is governed; and

In effecting the merger, the corporation or eligible entity complies with such laws and with its articles of incorporation or organizational documents.

The manner and basis of converting the shares of each merging corporation and eligible interest of each merging eligible entity into shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares or other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing;

The articles of incorporation of any corporation, or the organizational documents of any eligible entity to be created by the merger, or if a new corporation or eligible entity is not to be created by the merger, any amendments to the survivor’s articles of incorporation, or organizational documents; and

Any other provisions required by the laws under which any party to the merger is organized or by which it is governed, or by the articles of incorporation or organizational documents of any such party.

The plan of merger must include:

The name of each corporation or eligible entity that will merge and the name of the corporation or eligible entity that will be the survivor of the merger;

The terms and conditions of the merger;

Terms of a plan of merger may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan in accordance with Section 79-4-1.20(k).

The plan of merger may also include a provision that the plan may be amended prior to filing the articles of merger with the Secretary of State, provided that if the shareholders of a domestic corporation that is a party to the merger are required or permitted to vote on the plan, the plan must provide that subsequent to approval of the plan by such shareholders the plan may not be amended to:

Change the amount or kind of shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares or other securities, cash, or other property to be received by the shareholders of or owners of interests in any party to the merger upon conversion of their shares or interests under the plan;

Change the articles of incorporation of any corporation or the organizational documents of any eligible entity, that will survive or be created as a result of the merger, except for changes permitted by Section 79-4-10.05 or by comparable provisions of the laws under which the foreign corporation or eligible entity is organized or governed; or

Change any of the other terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect such shareholders in any material respect.

Liability from a merger shall be limited as provided in Sections 79-33-1 through 79-33-9.

HISTORY:
Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.02 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.02] renumbered as §79-4-11.03 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 17. Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.01 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.01] amended and renumbered as §79-4-11.02 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 16; Laws, 2004, ch. 353, § 7; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 9; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 27, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Section 7 of ch. 353, Laws of 2004, effective from and after passage (approved April 20, 2004), amended this section. Section 9 of ch. 495, Laws of 2004, effective from and after July 1, 2004, also amended this section.
As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 9 of ch. 495, Laws of 2004, pursuant to Section 1-3-79 which provides that whenever the same section of law is amended by different bills during the same legislative session, the amendment with the latest effective date shall supersede all other amendments to the same section effective on an earlier date.

This section, formerly appearing as § 79-4-11.01, was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-11.02 by
Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 16.
Former § 79-4-11.02 was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-11.03 by
Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 17.

The 2000 amendment rewrote and renumbered the section.

The first 2004 amendment (ch. 353) added (f).

The second 2004 amendment (ch. 495) rewrote (d); and added (f).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “eligible” for “other” preceding “entity” and “interests” throughout the section.

Merger of corporations under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-319 through 79-11-327.

Merger of one or more foreign business or nonprofit corporations with one or more domestic nonprofit corporations, see § 79-11-327.

Acquisition of control shares pursuant to a merger under this article as not constituting control share acquisition, see § 79-27-5.

Documentary evidence was not required to show the existence of a merger of two corporations. Although it may have been preferable to have introduced the certificate of merger, the testimony of an officer of one of the corporations was sufficient to prove the existence of the merger. Weeks v. Cal-Maine Foods, Inc., 522 So. 2d 725, 1987 Miss. LEXIS 2970 (Miss. 1987).

In the absence of proof of the existence of a de facto merger, or of any bona fide or colorable attempt to comply with the statutory requirements for corporate mergers, a creditor cannot maintain a joint and several action against two corporations for debts incurred only by one.
Jac See Packing Co. v. C. & F. Packing House Market, Inc., 215 So. 2d 704, 1968 Miss. LEXIS 1373 (Miss. 1968).

Similarity of ownership or control as basis for charging corporation acquiring assets of another with liability for former owner’s debts.
49 A.L.R.3d 881.

Products liability: liability of successor corporation for injury or damage caused by product issued by predecessor.
66 A.L.R.3d 824.

Liability of successor corporation for punitive damages for injury caused by predecessor’s product.
55 A.L.R.4th 166.

Sufficiency, under § 14 of Securities Exchange Act of 1934 ( 15 USCS § 78n) and implementing regulations, of proxy or information statement incident to merger of corporation.
4 A.L.R. Fed. 1021.

Who acquires rights under patent license owned by constituent corporation in case of corporate merger or consolidation.
49 A.L.R. Fed. 890.

What constitutes violation of § 208 of Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) ( 29 USCS § 1058), prohibiting certain mergers, consolidations, and transfers involving pension plans.
103 A.L.R. Fed. 390.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2239 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 401 et seq. (consolidation and merger).

20 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 609, De Facto Merger of Two Corporations.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1617 et seq.

Clarke, The fiduciary obligations of lenders in leveraged buyouts.
54 Miss. L. J. 423, Sept.-Dec., 1984.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-11.03.
Share exchange.

Through a share exchange:

A domestic corporation may acquire all of the shares of one or more classes or series of shares of another domestic or foreign corporation, or all of the interests of one or more classes or series of interests of a domestic or foreign eligible entity, in exchange for shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares or other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, pursuant to a plan of share exchange; or

All of the shares of one or more classes or series of shares of a domestic corporation may be acquired by another domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity, in exchange for shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares or other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, pursuant to a plan of share exchange.

The manner and basis of exchanging shares of a corporation or interests in an eligible entity whose shares or interests will be acquired under the share exchange into shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares or other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing; and

Any other provisions required by the laws under which any party to the share exchange is organized or by the articles of incorporation or organizational documents of any such party.

A foreign corporation, or a domestic or foreign eligible entity, may be a party to the share exchange only if:

The share exchange is permitted by the laws under which the corporation or eligible entity is organized or by which it is governed; and

In effecting the share exchange, the corporation or eligible entity complies with such laws and with its articles of incorporation or organizational documents.

The plan of share exchange must include:

The name of each corporation or eligible entity whose shares or interests will be acquired and the name of the corporation or eligible entity that will acquire those shares or interests;

The terms and conditions of the share exchange;

Terms of a plan of share exchange may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan in accordance with Section 79-4-1.20(k).

The plan of share exchange may also include a provision that the plan may be amended prior to filing of the articles of share exchange with the Secretary of State, provided that if the shareholders of a domestic corporation that is a party to the share exchange are required or permitted to vote on the plan, the plan must provide that subsequent to approval of the plan by such shareholders the plan may not be amended to:

Change the amount or kind of shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares or other securities, cash, or other property to be issued by the corporation or to be received by the shareholders of or owners of interests in any party to the share exchange in exchange for their shares or interests under the plan; or

Change any of the terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect such shareholders in any material respect.

Section 79-4-11.03 does not limit the power of a domestic corporation to acquire shares of another corporation or interests in another entity in a transaction other than a share exchange.

HISTORY:
Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.03 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.03] renumbered as §79-4-11.04 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 18. Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.02 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.02] amended and renumbered as §79-4-11.03 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 17; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 10; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 28, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

This section, formerly appearing as § 79-4-11.02, was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-11.03 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 17. Former § 79-4-11.03 was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-11.04 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 18.

The 2000 amendment rewrote and renumbered the section.

The 2004 amendment rewrote (d).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “eligible” for “other” preceding “entity” throughout the section.

Shareholder’s right to appraisal, see § 79-4-13.02.

Merger of corporations under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-319 through 79-11-327.

Products liability: liability of successor corporation for injury or damage caused by product issued by predecessor.
66 A.L.R.3d 824.

Liability of successor corporation for punitive damages for injury caused by predecessor’s product.
55 A.L.R.4th 166.

Who acquires rights under patent license owned by constituent corporation in case of corporate merger or consolidation.
49 A.L.R. Fed. 890.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2239 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1617 et seq.

§79-4-11.04.
Action on a plan of merger or share exchange.

In the case of a domestic corporation that is a party to a merger or share exchange:

The plan of merger or share exchange must be adopted by the board of directors.

Except as provided in subsection (g) and in Section 79-4-11.05, after adopting the plan of merger, the board of directors must submit the plan to the shareholders for their approval. After adopting the plan of share exchange, the board of directors of the corporation whose shares will be acquired in the share exchange must submit the plan to the shareholders for their approval. The board of directors must also transmit to the shareholders a recommendation that the shareholders approve the plan of merger or share exchange, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors must transmit to the shareholders the basis for that determination.

The board of directors may condition its submission of the plan of merger or share exchange to the shareholders on any basis.

If the plan of merger or share exchange is required to be approved by the shareholders, and if the approval is to be given at a meeting, the corporation must notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the meeting of shareholders at which the plan is to be submitted for approval. The notice must state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan and must contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. If the corporation is to be merged into an existing corporation or eligible entity, the notice shall also include or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the articles of incorporation or organizational documents of that corporation or eligible entity. If the corporation is to be merged into a corporation or eligible entity that is to be created pursuant to the merger, the notice shall include or be accompanied by a copy or a summary of the articles of incorporation or organizational documents of the new corporation or eligible entity.

Unless the articles of incorporation, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (c), requires a greater vote or a greater number of votes to be present, the approval of the plan of merger or share exchange shall require the approval of the shareholders at a meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the plan exists, and, if any class or series of shares is entitled to vote as a separate group on the plan of merger or share exchange, the approval of each such separate voting group at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group consisting of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the merger or share exchange by that voting group is present.

Separate voting by voting groups is required:

On a plan of merger, by each class or series of shares that (A) are to be converted, pursuant to the provisions of the plan of merger, into shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares or other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, or (B) would have a right to vote as a separate group on a provision of the plan that, if contained in a proposed amendment to articles of incorporation, would require action by separate voting groups under Section 79-4-10.04;

On a plan of share exchange, by each class or series of shares included in the exchange, with each class or series constituting a separate voting group; and

On a plan of merger or share exchange, if the voting group is entitled under the articles of incorporation to vote as a voting group to approve a plan of merger or share exchange.

The number of voting shares outstanding immediately after the merger, plus the number of voting shares issuable as a result of the merger (either by the conversion of securities issued pursuant to the merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued pursuant to the merger), will not exceed by more than twenty percent (20%) the total number of voting shares of the surviving corporation outstanding immediately before the merger; and

The number of participating shares outstanding immediately after the merger, plus the number of participating shares issuable as a result of the merger (either by the conversion of securities issued pursuant to the merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued pursuant to the merger), will not exceed by more than twenty percent (20%) the total number of participating shares outstanding immediately before the merger.

Unless the articles of incorporation otherwise provide, approval by the corporation’s shareholders of a plan of merger is not required if:

The corporation will survive the merger; and

Except for amendments permitted by Section 79-4-10.05, its articles of incorporation will not be changed; and

Each shareholder of the corporation whose shares were outstanding immediately before the effective date of the merger will hold the same number of shares, with identical preferences, limitations, and relative rights, immediately after the effective date of change; and

As used in subsection (g):

“Participating shares” means shares that entitle their holders to participate without limitation in distributions.

“Voting shares” means shares that entitle their holders to vote unconditionally in elections of directors.

If as a result of a merger or share exchange one or more shareholders of a domestic corporation would become subject to personal liability for the obligations or liabilities of any other person or entity, approval of the plan of merger shall require the execution, by each such shareholder, of a separate written consent to become subject to such personal liability.

HISTORY:
Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.04 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.04] renumbered as §79-4-11.05 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 19. Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.03 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.03] amended and renumbered as §79-4-11.04 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 18; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 29, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

This section, formerly appearing as § 79-4-11.03, was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-11.04 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 18. Former § 79-4-11.04 was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-11.05 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 19.

The 2000 amendment rewrote and renumbered the section.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “eligible” for “other” preceding “entity” throughout (d).

Voting groups generally, see §§ 79-4-7.25, 79-4-7.26.

Voting on amendments by voting groups generally, see § 79-4-10.04.

Authorization for corporations to merge, see § 79-4-11.02.

Authorization for corporation to participate in share exchange, see § 79-4-11.03.

Effect of merger or share exchange, see § 79-4-11.07.

Abandonment of merger or share exchange, see § 79-4-11.08.

Shareholder’s right to appraisal, see § 79-4-13.02.

Merger of corporations under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-319 through 79-11-327.

Action on plan of merger under Revised Limited Liability Company Act, see § 79-29-223.

Products liability: liability of successor corporation for injury or damage caused by product issued by predecessor.
66 A.L.R.3d 824.

Who acquires rights under patent license owned by constituent corporation in case of corporate merger or consolidation.
49 A.L.R. Fed. 890.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2242, 2246.

20 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 609, De Facto Merger of Two Corporations.

19 C.J.S., Corporations § 1611.

§79-4-11.05.
Merger between parent and subsidiary or between subsidiaries.

A domestic parent corporation that owns shares of a domestic or foreign subsidiary corporation that carry at least ninety percent (90%) of the voting power of each class and series of the outstanding shares of the subsidiary that have voting power may merge the subsidiary into itself or into another such subsidiary, or merge itself into the subsidiary, without the approval of the board of directors or shareholders of the subsidiary unless the articles of incorporation of any of the corporations otherwise provide, and unless, in the case of a foreign subsidiary, approval by the subsidiary’s board of directors or shareholders is required by the laws under which the subsidiary is organized.

If under subsection (a) approval of a merger by the subsidiary’s shareholders is not required, the parent corporation shall, within ten (10) days after the effective date of the merger, notify each of the subsidiary’s shareholders that the merger has become effective.

Except as provided in subsections (a) and (b), a merger between a parent and a subsidiary shall be governed by the provisions of Title 79, Chapter 4, Article 11 applicable to mergers generally.

HISTORY:
Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.05 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.05] renumbered as §79-4-11.06 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 20. Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.04 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.04] amended and renumbered as §79-4-11.05 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

This section, formerly appearing as § 79-4-11.04, was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-11.05 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 19. Former § 79-4-11.05 was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-11.06 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 20.

The 2000 amendment rewrote and renumbered the section.

Shareholder’s right to appraisal, see § 79-4-13.02.

Requirement that parent corporation, in a merger pursuant to this section, notify all record shareholders of the subsidiary who are entitled to assert appraisal rights that the corporate action became effective, see § 79-4-13.20.

Materials to be included in notice to record shareholders required by § 79-4-13.20, see § 79-4-13.22.

Merger of corporations under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-319 through 79-11-327.

Liability of corporation for contracts of subsidiary. 38 A.L.R.3d 1102.

Similarity of ownership or control as basis for charging corporation acquiring assets of another with liability for former owner’s debts.
49 A.L.R.3d 881.

Products liability: liability of successor corporation for injury or damage caused by product issued by predecessor.
66 A.L.R.3d 824.

Liability of successor corporation for punitive damages for injury caused by predecessor’s product.
55 A.L.R.4th 166.

Who acquires rights under patent license owned by constituent corporation in case of corporate merger or consolidation.
49 A.L.R. Fed. 890.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 2243.

20 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 609, De Facto Merger of Two Corporations.

§79-4-11.06.
Articles of merger or share exchange.

After a plan of merger or share exchange has been adopted and approved as required by the Mississippi Business Corporation Act, articles of merger or share exchange shall be signed on behalf of each party to the merger or share exchange by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles shall set forth:

The names of the parties to the merger or share exchange and the date on which the merger or share exchange occurred or is to be effective;

If the articles of incorporation of the survivor of a merger are amended, or if a new corporation is created as a result of a merger, the amendments to the survivor’s articles of incorporation or the articles of incorporation of the new corporation;

If the plan of merger or share exchange required approval by the shareholders of a domestic corporation that was a party to the merger or share exchange, a statement that the plan was duly approved by the shareholders and, if voting by any separate voting group was required, by each such separate voting group, in the manner required by the Mississippi Business Corporation Act and the articles of incorporation;

If the plan of merger or share exchange did not require approval by the shareholders of a domestic corporation that was a party to the merger or share exchange, a statement to that effect; and

As to each foreign corporation and each eligible entity that was a party to the merger or share exchange, a statement that the plan and the performance of its terms were duly authorized by all action required by the laws under which the corporation or eligible entity is organized or by which it is governed, and by its articles of incorporation or organizational documents.

Articles of merger or share exchange shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing by the survivor of the merger or the acquiring corporation in a share exchange and shall take effect on the effective date.

HISTORY:
Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.06 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.06] renumbered as §79-4-11.07 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 21. Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.05 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.05] amended and renumbered as §79-4-11.06 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 20; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 30, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

This section, formerly appearing as § 79-4-11.05, was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-11.06 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 20. Former § 79-4-11.06 was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-11.07 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 21.

The 2000 amendment rewrote and renumbered the section.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “signed” for “executed” preceding “on behalf” in (a); and substituted “eligible” for “other” twice in (a)(5).

Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-1.01 et seq.

Action on plan of merger or share exchange, see § 79-4-11.04.

Effect of merger or share exchange, see § 79-4-11.07.

Merger of corporations under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-319 through 79-11-327.

Certificate of merger under Limited Liability Company Act, see § 79-29-211.

Effect of merger or consolidation of domestic stock insurance company with another domestic or foreign stock insurance company is as provided in this section, see § 83-19-119.

Products liability: liability of successor corporation for injury or damage caused by product issued by predecessor.
66 A.L.R.3d 824.

Who acquires rights under patent license owned by constituent corporation in case of corporate merger or consolidation.
49 A.L.R. Fed. 890.

§79-4-11.07.
Effect of merger or share exchange.

When a merger becomes effective:

The corporation or eligible entity that is designated in the plan of merger as the survivor continues or comes into existence, as the case may be;

The separate existence of every corporation or eligible entity that is merged into the survivor ceases;

All property owned by, and every contract right possessed by, each corporation or eligible entity that merges into the survivor is vested in the survivor without reversion or impairment;

All liabilities of each corporation or eligible entity that is merged into the survivor are vested in the survivor subject to the limitations as provided in Sections 79-33-1 through 79-33-9;

The name of the survivor may, but need not be, substituted in any pending proceeding for the name of any party to the merger whose separate existence ceased in the merger;

The articles of incorporation or organizational documents of the survivor are amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger;

The articles of incorporation or organizational documents of a survivor that is created by the merger become effective; and

The shares of each corporation that is a party to the merger, and the interests in an eligible entity that is a party to a merger, that are to be converted under the plan of merger into shares, interests, obligations, rights to acquire securities, other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, are converted and the former holders of such shares or interests are entitled only to the rights provided to them in the plan of merger or to any rights they may have under Title 79, Chapter 4, Article 13.

When a share exchange becomes effective, the shares of each domestic corporation that are to be exchanged for shares or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares or securities, other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, are entitled only to the rights provided to them in the plan of share exchange or to any rights they may have under Title 79, Chapter 4, Article 13.

Any shareholder of a domestic corporation that is a party to a merger or share exchange who, prior to the merger or share exchange, was liable for the liabilities or obligations of such corporation, shall not be released from such liabilities or obligations by reason of the merger or share exchange.

Upon a merger becoming effective, a foreign corporation, or a foreign eligible entity, that is the survivor of the merger is deemed to:

Agree that service of process in a proceeding to enforce the rights of shareholders of each domestic corporation that is a party to the merger who exercise appraisal rights, may be made in the manner provided in Section 79-35-13; and

Agree that it will promptly pay the amount, if any, to which such shareholders are entitled under Title 79, Chapter 4, Article 13.

HISTORY:
Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.07 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.07] deleted by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 21. Former 1972 Code §79-4-11.06 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.06] amended and renumbered as §79-4-11.07 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 21; Laws, 2004, ch. 353, § 8; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 32; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 31, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Section 31 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 24, 2012), amended this section. Section 32 of Chapter 382, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 17, 2012), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 31 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes § 79-4-11.07 as amended by Laws of 2012, ch. 382.

This section, formerly appearing as § 79-4-11.06, was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-11.07 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 21.

A former § 79-4-11.07 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 11.07, eff from and after January 1, 1988] pertaining to merger or share exchange with foreign corporations was deleted by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 21, effective from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment rewrote and renumbered the section.

The 2004 amendment added “subject to the limitations as provided in §§ 79-33-1 et seq.” at the end of (a)(4).

The first 2012 amendment (ch. 382), effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (d)(1); and made minor stylistic changes.

The second 2012 amendment (ch. 481), effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (d)(1); and substituted “eligible” for “other” preceding “entity” throughout the section.

“Other entity” defined, see § 79-4-11.01.

Abandonment of merger or share exchange, see § 79-4-11.08.

Appraisal rights, Title 79, Chapter 4, Article 13, see §§ 79-4-13.01 through 79-4-13.40.

Merger of corporations under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-319 through 79-11-327.

A corporate obligor and those who control it may not with impunity dissolve the corporation in a debt avoidance maneuver and cause its assets to be transferred to a new successor corporation. This is so whether the debt arises in contract, quasi-contract, or tort. Where a corporation unsuccessfully sought to avoid liability on a contract with a former shareholder by dissolving the corporation and transferring assets to a newly formed corporation, the shareholder’s rights against the new corporation were limited to the extent that the new corporation acquired assets of the contracting corporation without paying fair value therefor. Morris v. Macione, 546 So. 2d 969, 1989 Miss. LEXIS 319 (Miss. 1989).

Tax liabilities as within agreement for assumption or payment of another’s obligations. 4 A.L.R.2d 1314.

Dividend rights in surplus of new consolidated corporation resulting from reduction of capital stock of former constituent corporations. 28 A.L.R.2d 1177.

Merger or consolidation of corporation as terminating charitable trust of which corporation is beneficiary. 34 A.L.R.3d 749.

Dominant shareholder’s accountability to minority for profit, bonus, or the like, received on sale of stock to outsiders. 38 A.L.R.3d 738.

Timeliness and sufficiency of dissenting stockholder’s notice of his objection to consolidation or merger and of his demand for payment for his shares. 40 A.L.R.3d 260.

Products liability: liability of successor corporation for injury or damage caused by product issued by predecessor.
66 A.L.R.3d 824.

Merger or consolidation of corporate lessee as breach of clause in lease prohibiting, conditioning, or restricting assignment or sublease. 39 A.L.R.4th 879.

Who acquires rights under patent license owned by constituent corporation in case of corporate merger or consolidation.
49 A.L.R. Fed. 890.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2249 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1626 et seq.

§79-4-11.08.
Abandonment of merger or share exchange.

Unless otherwise provided in a plan of merger or share exchange or in the laws under which a foreign corporation or a domestic or foreign eligible entity that is a party to a merger or a share exchange is organized or by which it is governed, after the plan has been adopted and approved as required by this article, and at any time before the merger or share exchange has become effective, it may be abandoned by any party thereto without action by the party’s shareholders or owners of interests, in accordance with any procedures set forth in the plan of merger or share exchange or, if no such procedures are set forth in the plan, in the manner determined by the board of directors, subject to any contractual rights of other parties to the merger or share exchange.

If a merger or share exchange is abandoned under subsection (a) after articles of merger or share exchange have been filed with the Secretary of State but before the merger or share exchange has become effective, a statement that the merger or share exchange has been abandoned in accordance with this section, signed on behalf of a party to the merger or share exchange by an officer or other duly authorized representative, shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing prior to the effective date of the merger or share exchange. Upon filing, the statement shall take effect and the merger or share exchange shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 22; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 32, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (a), substituted “eligible” for “other” preceding “entity”, and deleted “of a corporation, or the managers of an other entity” following “board of directors” near the end; and substituted signed” for “executed” preceding “on behalf” in (b).

“Other entity” defined, see § 79-4-11.01.

Merger of corporations under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-319 through 79-11-327.

Abandonment of merger under Limited Liability Company Act, see § 79-29-213.